Wisconsin, session 2025, AB718.
do enact as follows:AB718,11Section 1. 253.105 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB718,2,52253.105 (1) (b) “Abortion-inducing drug” has the meaning given in s. 253.10 3(2) (am) means a drug, medicine, oral hormonal compound, mixture, or preparation, 4when it is prescribed to terminate the pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant 5with an intention other than to produce a live birth or remove a dead fetus.AB718,26Section 2. 253.105 (1) (bg) of the statutes is created to read:AB718,3,31253.105 (1) (bg) “Catch kit” means a collection container designed to catch 2and hold medical waste or infectious waste, often used for collecting samples for 3testing.AB718,34Section 3. 253.105 (1) (br) of the statutes is created to read:AB718,3,85253.105 (1) (br) “Medical waste bag” means a biohazardous waste container 6made to contain medical or biohazardous waste that is fluorescent orange or 7orange-red with a label in a contrasting color affixed to its exterior stating 8“BIOHAZARD.”AB718,49Section 4. 253.105 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB718,3,1210253.105 (2) (intro.) No person may give or attempt to give an abortion-11inducing drug to a woman unless the physician who prescribed, or otherwise 12provided, the abortion-inducing drug for the woman:AB718,513Section 5. 253.105 (2) (c) and (d) of the statutes are created to read:AB718,3,1614253.105 (2) (c) Ensures that a follow-up visit for the patient is scheduled with 15the physician’s office to occur not more than 7 days after the use or administration 16of the abortion-inducing drug to assess the patient’s physical condition.AB718,3,1917(d) Provides a catch kit and medical waste bag, including instructions for the 18patient to use the catch kit and medical waste bag and to return the catch kit and 19medical waste bag to the physician’s office for proper disposal.AB718,620Section 6. 253.105 (2r) of the statutes is created to read:AB718,3,2121253.105 (2r) Manufacturer responsibilities. (a) In this subsection:AB718,3,23221. “Endocrine disruptor” means a chemical that interferes with the hormones 23of a human body.AB718,4,212. “Pathological waste” means the remains of an abortion effectuated with the 2use of an abortion-inducing drug.AB718,4,93(b) The manufacturer of any abortion-inducing drug shall be responsible for 4proper disposal of the abortion-inducing drugs and mitigation of any release of an 5endocrine disruptor caused by the improper disposal of abortion-inducing drugs, 6including from the disposal of pathological waste. If an endocrine disruptor 7resulting from the improper disposal of an abortion-inducing drug is detected in 8wastewater, the manufacturer of the abortion-inducing drug shall be subject to the 9requirements of ch. 292 as they pertain to the discharge of the endocrine disruptor.AB718,710Section 7. 253.105 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 253.105 (3) (a).AB718,811Section 8. 253.105 (3) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB718,4,1312253.105 (3) (b) A violation of sub. (2r) is punishable by a forfeiture of not more 13than $20,000 per violation.AB718,914Section 9. 281.17 (11) of the statutes is created to read:AB718,4,1815281.17 (11) The department shall require operators of wastewater treatment 16plants, as defined in sub. (3), to regularly test for the presence of endocrine 17disruptors, as defined in s. 253.105 (2r) (a) 1., and may assist the operators to 18develop that capacity.AB718,1019Section 10. 292.01 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:AB718,5,520292.01 (5) “Hazardous substance” means any substance or combination of 21substances including any waste of a solid, semisolid, liquid or gaseous form which 22may cause or significantly contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in 23serious irreversible or incapacitating reversible illness or which may pose a 24substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment 1because of its quantity, concentration or physical, chemical or infectious 2characteristics. This term includes, but is not limited to, substances which are 3toxic, corrosive, flammable, irritants, strong sensitizers or explosives as determined 4by the department. This term includes an endocrine disruptor, as defined in s. 5253.105 (2r) (a) 1.AB718,116Section 11. Initial applicability.AB718,5,87(1) This act first applies to the prescription or other provision of an abortion-8inducing drug to a woman on the effective date of this subsection.AB718,129Section 12. Effective date.AB718,5,1010(1) This act takes effect on May 1, 2026.AB718,5,1111